Louisiana, session 2026, HB589.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1113 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1113. Siting requirements
A. No Class VI injection wellhead shall be located within five hundred feet
of the following:
(1) Inhabited dwellings not owned by the storage operator or any owner in
interest bound by a contract with the storage operator that allows for location of a
Class VI injection well within five hundred feet of an inhabited dwelling.
(2) Schools.
(3) Healthcare facilities.
B. No pipeline for transport of carbon dioxide shall be constructed within
five hundred feet of the following:
(1) Inhabited dwellings.
(2) Schools.
(3) Healthcare facilities.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-515 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 589